Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201846-1116.01
Working day, defined.

Working
day shall mean Monday through Friday but shall not include Saturday, Sunday,
or a federal or state holiday. In computing two working days, the day of receipt
of the permit is not included and the last day of the two working days is
included.

Laws 2014, LB272, § 3.